California, session 20252026, SB519.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Article 8.3 (commencing with Section 999.90) is added to Chapter 6 of Division 4 of the Military and Veterans Code, to read: Article 8.3. Veteran Task Force999.90. The Veteran Task Force is hereby created for the purpose of reversing the trend of veterans and individuals transitioning from the military who are leaving California to reside and work in another state.999.91. (a) The Veteran Task Force shall consist of all of the following members:(1) The secretary, director, commissioner, chair, or adjutant general, as applicable, or their designee, from each of the following:(A) Business, Consumer Services, and Housing Agency.(B) California Health and Human Services Agency.(C) Department of Veterans Affairs.(D) Department of the California Highway Patrol.(E) Employment Development Department.(F) Governor’s Military Council.(G) Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development (Go-Biz).(H) Military Department.(2) The chairperson of the Assembly Appropriations Committee or a representative appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.(3) The chairperson of the Assembly Committee on Military and Veterans Affairs or a representative appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.(4) The chairperson of the Senate Appropriations Committee or a representative appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules.(5) The chairperson of the Senate Committee on Military and Veterans Affairs or a representative appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules.(6) A representative of public or private institutions of higher education.(7) A representative of each of the following stakeholder organizations:(A) CAL FIRE Local 2881.(B) California Hispanic Chambers of Commerce.(C) California Professional Firefighters.(D) California State Sheriffs’ Association.(E) Chief Probation Officers of California.(F) International Brotherhood of Teamsters.(G) Peace Officers Research Association of California.(H) San Diego Military Advisory Council, who shall be the vice chairperson of the task force.(I) Sheet Metal Air Rail Transportation Local Union 104.(J) The State Building and Construction Trades Council of California.(K) U.S. VETS.(L) VetFund Foundation, who shall be the chairperson of the task force.(M) Veterans in Business Network.(b) Members of the task force shall not receive any compensation.999.92. (a) The task force shall do all of the following:(1) Examine various services, opportunities, and policies across departments that could be offered to veterans as incentives for them and their families to remain in California.(2) Conceive, investigate, and recommend diverse ideas that would contribute to achieving the objective of retaining veterans in California.(3) Examine all of the following objectives:(A) Existing veteran benefits in California.(B) Assistance for individuals transitioning from the military.(C) License portability for military and veteran spouses.(D) Childcare availability.(E) Affordable housing.(F) Taxation relief.(G) Veteran-owned businesses.(b) The task force may establish working groups, task forces, or other structures from within its membership or with outside members to assist it in its work.SECTION 1.It is the intent of the Legislature to enact legislation creating a task force that focuses on retaining veterans in California to help solve the shortage of labor and key professional skills, and improving the economic opportunities available to military families in the state.